test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-I-D-miskotākay-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - miskotâkay - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, coat/dress    AEW C-initial NDI2
     miskotâkay+N+A+Sg: miskotâkay
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: niskotâkay
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kiskotâkay
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: niskotâkânân
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kiskotâkânaw
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kiskotâkâwâw

     miskotâkay+N+A+Pl: miskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: niskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kiskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: niskotâkânâna
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kiskotâkânawa
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kiskotâkâwâwa

     miskotâkay+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: oskotâkaya
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: oskotâkâwâwa
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: oskotâkâyiwa
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: oskotâkâyiwa

     miskotâkay+N+A+Loc: miskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: niskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kiskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: niskotâkânâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px12Pl+Loc: kiskotâkânâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kiskotâkâwâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: oskotâkâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: oskotâkâwâhk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px4Sg+Loc: oskotâkâyihk
     miskotâkay+N+A+Px4Pl+Loc: oskotâkâyihk

     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: miskocâkâs
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [miskocâkâs, miskocâkâsis]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [niskocâkâs, niskocâkâsis]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kiskocâkâs, kiskocâkâsis]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [niskocâkâsinân, niskocâkâsisinân]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kiskocâkâsinaw, kiskocâkâsisinaw]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kiskocâkâsiwâw, kiskocâkâsisiwâw]

     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [miskocâkâsa, miskocâkâsisa]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [niskocâkâsa, niskocâkâsisa]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kiskocâkâsa, kiskocâkâsisa]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [niskocâkâsinâna, niskocâkâsisinâna]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kiskocâkâsinawa, kiskocâkâsisinawa]
     miskocâkay+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kiskocâkâsiwâwa, kiskocâkâsisiwâwa]
